Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.1a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 353.1a. A. Prescribing authority shall be allowed,
under the medical direction of a supervising physician, for an
advanced practice nurse recognized by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing
in one of the following categories: advanced registered nurse
Req. No. 12463 Page 1

prac titioners, clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse-
midwives. The advanced practice nurse may write or sign, or
transmit by word of mouth, telephone or other means of communication
an order for drugs or medical supplies that is intended to be
filled, compounded, or dispensed by a pharmacist. The supervising
physician and the advanced practice nurse shall be identified at the
time of origination of the prescription and the name of the advanced
practice nurse shall be printed on the prescription label.
B. Pharmacists may dispense prescriptions for noncontrolled
prescription drugs authorized by an out-of-state licensed
practitioner, as defined in Section 353.1 of this title, if the
licensed practitioner is lawfully licensed and in good standing in
the state in which he or she is actively prescribing and if the
noncontrolled prescription is otherwise lawful under Oklahoma law.
Pharmacists may dispense prescriptions for non-controlled
noncontrolled prescription drugs authorized by an advanced practice
nurse or physician assistant, not located in Oklahoma, provided that
they are he or she is licensed in the state in which they are he or
she is actively prescribing.
C. Pharmacists may dispense prescriptions for controlled
dangerous substances prescribed by an out-of-state licensed
practitioner, as defined in Section 353.1 of this title, if the
licensed practitioner is lawfully licensed and in good standing in
the state in which he or she is actively prescribing and if the
Req. No. 12463 Page 2

cont rolled dangerous substance is otherwise lawful under Oklahoma
law. Pharmacists may only dispense prescriptions for controlled
dangerous substances prescribed by an advanced practice nurse or
physician assistant licensed in the State of Oklahoma and supervised
by an Oklahoma-licensed practitioner, provided the controlled
dangerous substance is otherwise lawful under Oklahoma Law.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-302, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 328, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2-302), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-302. A. Every Except as otherwise provided by law,
every person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, prescribes,
administers or uses for scientific purposes any controlled dangerous
substance within or into this state, or who proposes to engage in
the manufacture, distribution, dispensing, prescribing,
administering or use for scientific purposes of any controlled
dangerous substance within or into this state shall obtain a
registration issued by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Director. Persons registered by the Director
under Section 2-101 et seq. of this title to manufacture,
distribute, dispense or conduct research with controlled dangerous
substances may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense or conduct
research with those substances to the extent authorized by their
registration and in conformity with the other provisions of the
Req. No. 12463 Page 3

Unif orm Controlled Dangerous Substances Act. Every wholesaler,
manufacturer or distributor of any drug product containing
pseudoephedrine or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers or
salts of isomers, shall obtain a registration issued by the Director
of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control in accordance with rules promulgated by the Director and as
provided for in Section 2-332 of this title. Any person who
manufactures, distributes, dispenses, prescribes, administers or
uses for scientific purposes any controlled dangerous substances
within or into this state without first obtaining a registration
issued by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control shall be subject to the same statutory and
administrative jurisdiction of the Director as if that person were
an applicant or registrant.
B. Out-of-state pharmaceutical suppliers who provide controlled
dangerous substances to individuals within this state shall obtain a
registration issued by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Director. This provision shall also apply to
wholesale distributors who distribute controlled dangerous
substances to pharmacies or other entities registered within this
state in accordance with rules promulgated by the Director.
C. Every person who owns in whole or in part a public or
private medical facility for which a majority of patients are issued
Req. No. 12463 Page 4

on a reoccurring monthly basis a prescription for opioids,
benzodiazepines, barbiturates or carisoprodol, but not including
buprenorphine with naloxone or buprenorphine as used for medication-
assisted treatment services, shall obtain a registration issued by
the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous
Drugs Control.
D. Every manufacturer and distributor required to register
under the provisions of this section shall provide all data required
pursuant to 21 U.S.C., Section 827(d)(1) on a monthly basis to the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control.
Controlled dangerous substances in Schedule I shall be reported in
accordance with rules promulgated by the Director. Reporting of
controlled dangerous substances pursuant to 21 U.S.C., Section
827(d)(1) shall include, but not be limited to:
1. The manufacturer's or distributor's name, address, phone
number, DEA registration number and controlled dangerous substance
registration number issued by the Bureau;
2. The name, address and DEA registration number of the entity
to whom the controlled dangerous substance was sold;
3. The date of the sale of the controlled dangerous substance;
4. The name and National Drug Code of the controlled dangerous
substance sold; and
5. The number of containers and the strength and quantity of
controlled dangerous substances in each container sold.
Req. No. 12463 Page 5

E. The information maintained and provided pursuant to
subsection D of this section shall be confidential and not open to
the public. Access to the information shall, at the discretion of
the Director, be limited to:
1. Peace officers certified pursuant to the provisions of
Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes who are employed
as investigative agents of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics
and Dangerous Drugs Control or the Office of the Attorney General;
2. The United States Drug Enforcement Administration Diversion
Group Supervisor; and
3. A multicounty grand jury properly convened pursuant to the
provisions of the Multicounty Grand Jury Act.
F. Manufacturers, distributors, home care agencies, hospices,
home care services, medical facility owners referred to in
subsection C of this section and scientific researchers shall obtain
a registration annually. Other practitioners shall obtain a
registration for a period to be determined by the Director that will
be for a period not less than one (1) year nor more than three (3)
years.
G. Every trainer or handler of a canine controlled dangerous
substances detector who, in the ordinary course of such trainer's or
handler's profession, desires to possess any controlled dangerous
substance, annually, shall obtain a registration issued by the
Director for a fee of Seventy Dollars ($70.00). Such persons shall
Req. No. 12463 Page 6

be s ubject to all applicable provisions of Section 2-101 et seq. of
this title and such applicable rules promulgated by the Director for
those individuals identified in subparagraph a of paragraph 32 42 of
Section 2-101 of this title. Persons registered by the Director
pursuant to this subsection may possess controlled dangerous
substances to the extent authorized by their registration and in
conformity with the other provisions of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act.
H. The following persons shall not be required to register and
may lawfully possess controlled dangerous substances under the
provisions of Section 2-101 et seq. of this title:
1. An agent, or an employee thereof, of any registered
manufacturer, distributor, dispenser or user for scientific purposes
of any controlled dangerous substance, if such agent is acting in
the usual course of such agent's or employee's business or
employment;
2. Any person lawfully acting under the direction of a person
authorized to administer controlled dangerous substances under
Section 2-312 of this title;
3. A common or contract carrier or warehouser, or an employee
thereof, whose possession of any controlled dangerous substance is
in the usual course of such carrier's or warehouser's business or
employment;

Req. No. 12463 Page 7

4. An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled
dangerous substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner;
5. An individual pharmacist acting in the usual course of such
pharmacist's employment with a pharmacy registered pursuant to the
provisions of Section 2-101 et seq. of this title;
6. A nursing home licensed by this state;
7. Any Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
employee or any person whose facility contracts with the Department
of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services whose possession of
any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 353.1 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, is for the purpose of delivery of a mental health
consumer's medicine to the consumer's home or residence;
8. Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses; and
9. An assisted living facility licensed by this state; and
10. An out-of-state licensed practitioner, as defined in
Section 353.1 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if the licensed
practitioner is lawfully licensed and in good standing in the state
in which he or she is actively prescribing prescription or
nonprescription drugs, including controlled substances, that are
lawful under Oklahoma law.
I. The Director may, by rule, waive the requirement for
registration or fee for registration of certain manufacturers,
distributors, dispensers, prescribers, administrators or users for

Req. No. 12463 Page 8

scie ntific purposes if the Director finds it consistent with the
public health and safety.
J. A separate registration shall be required at each principal
place of business or professional practice where the applicant
manufactures, distributes, dispenses, prescribes, administers or
uses for scientific purposes controlled dangerous substances.
K. The Director is authorized to inspect the establishment of a
registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Director.
L. No person engaged in a profession or occupation for which a
license to engage in such activity is provided by law shall be
registered under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act
unless such person holds a valid license of such person's profession
or occupation.
M. Registrations shall be issued on the first day of November
of each year and shall expire annually. Registrations may be issued
at other times, however, upon certification of the professional
licensing board. Registration applications shall be required
annually thereafter.
N. The licensing boards of all professions and occupations to
which the use of controlled dangerous substances is incidental shall
furnish a current list to the Director, not later than the first day
of October of each year, of the persons holding valid licenses. All
such persons except persons exempt from registration requirements
Req. No. 12463 Page 9

unde r subsection H of this section shall be subject to the
registration requirements of Section 2-101 et seq. of this title.
O. The licensing board of any professional defined as a mid-
level practitioner shall notify and furnish to the Director, not
later than the first day of October of each year, that such
professional holds a valid license, a current listing of individuals
licensed and registered with their respective boards to prescribe,
order, select, obtain and administer controlled dangerous
substances. The licensing board shall immediately notify the
Director of any action subsequently taken against any such
individual.
P. Beginning November 1, 2010, each registrant that prescribes,
administers or dispenses methadone shall be required to check the
prescription profile of the patient on the central repository of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control.
Q. All legal entities applying for or approved for registration
shall disclose to the Director all beneficial owners of the legal
entity. Publicly traded entities shall be exempt from full
disclosure; provided that, the publicly traded entity discloses to
the Director all beneficial owners who exercise authority or control
over controlled dangerous substances at each registered location.
R. No registration, or any authority conferred thereby, shall
be leased, assigned, or otherwise transferred. No registration
shall be transferrable on change of ownership or business activity.
Req. No. 12463 Page 10

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12463 TJ 02/10/25





















Req. No. 12463 Page 11